ml_IN.aff
SET    UTF-8
# Minimum length of words in compound words. 
COMPOUNDMIN 1
	
# Words signed with COMPOUNDFLAG may be in compound words
# (except when word shorter than COMPOUNDMIN).
# Affixes with COMPOUNDFLAG also permits compounding of affixed words.
COMPOUNDFLAG c

# Suffixes signed with ONLYINCOMPOUND flag may be only inside of compounds
# (Fuge-elements in German, fogemorphemes in Swedish). 
# ONLYINCOMPOUND #flag works also with words (see tests/onlyincompound.*).
ONLYINCOMPOUND x

COMPOUNDPERMITFLAG P

# Mak end of compound
COMPOUNDEND e

REP    9
REP    മ ം
REP    ം    മ
REP    ൻ‍റ    ന്റ
REP    എൻറെ    എന്റെ
REP    ററ    റ്റ
REP    ൌ   ൗ
REP    ൗ     ൌ
REP    ദ    ധ
REP    ധ    ദ

# Duplication of k if word starts with ka
PFX    2    Y	3
PFX    2    ക	ക്ക/P	.
PFX    2    പ	പ്പ/P	.
PFX    2    ത	ത്ത/P	.

PFX    1    Y    1
PFX    1    അ        0/Px

SFX    a    Y   1
SFX    a    ഥ   ഥാ/P
	
SFX    p    Y    6
SFX    p    ി    കള്‍/L
SFX    p    ല    ലകള്‍
SFX    p    ഥ    ഥകള്‍/L
SFX    p    ്    ുകള്‍
SFX    p    ം    ങ്ങള്‍/L
SFX    p    ം    0/Px

SFX    L    Y    9
SFX    L    ള്‍    ളിലെ
SFX    L    ള്‍    ളില്‍/L
SFX    L    ള്‍    ളുടെ
SFX    L    ള്‍    ള്‍ക്ക്
SFX    L    ള്‍    ള/Px
SFX    L    ള്‍    ളിലേയ്ക്ക്/s
SFX    L    ള്‍    ളിലേത്/s
SFX    L    ള്‍    ളില്ല
SFX    L    ള്‍    ളുണ്ടു്

SFX    m    Y    7
SFX    m    ം    ത്തെ
SFX    m    ം    ത്തു
SFX    m    ം    ത്ത്/s
SFX    m    ം    ത്തിലെ
SFX    m    ം    ത്തിലേയ്ക്ക്/s
SFX    m    ം    ത്തെയും
SFX    m    ം    ത്തേയും

# Samvruthokaram
SFX    s    Y    1
SFX    s   ്   ു്
