ml_IN.dic
14
മുറ്റം/m,p,c
എന്റെ
അപവാദം/m,p,1
ജീവിതം/m,p
അത്/s
തിര/c,p,K
തിരു/c
മാല/c,p,L,a
കഥ/c,p,2,a
പൂ/c
നീല/c
തിമിംഗലം/c,2
പ്രത്യയം/m,c,p
ശാസ്ത്രം/m,c,p
